Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201277-5412
Report; contents.

(1)
The Tax Commissioner shall submit electronically an
annual report to the Legislature no later than June 30 of each year.

(2) The report shall state by industry group (a) the credits earned,
(b) the credits used to reduce the corporate income tax and the credits used
to reduce the individual income tax, (c) the number of jobs created, (d) the
total number of employees employed by taxpayers at qualifying projects on
the last day of the calendar quarter prior to the application date and the
total number of employees employed by the taxpayers for the projects on subsequent
reporting dates, (e) the expansion of capital investment, (f) the estimated
wage levels of jobs created subsequent to the application date, (g) the total
number of qualified applicants, (h) the projected future state revenue gains
and losses, and (i) the credits outstanding.

(3) No information shall be provided in the report that is protected
by state or federal confidentiality laws.

Laws 2000, LB 936, § 12;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 143.